Massachusetts, session 194th, H2056.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42 of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 13, after the word “58A”, the following
words:- ; and, provided further, that if a person is arrested for a violation of section 32 of chapter
94C for the manufacture, sale or distribution of fentanyl, subsections (c ½) or (c ¾) of section
32E of said chapter 94C or subsection (a) of section 32F of said chapter 94C for the manufacture,
sale or distribution of fentanyl, any bail shall be assessed pursuant to sections 57 and 58.
SECTION 2. Section 57 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the sixth paragraph the following paragraph:-
of 3

Except where prohibited by this section, for any violation of (i) section 32 of chapter 94C
for the manufacture, sale or distribution of fentanyl; (ii) subsections (c ½) or (c ¾) of section 32E
of said chapter 94C; or (iii) subsection (a) of section 32F of said chapter 94C for the
manufacture, sale or distribution of fentanyl, a person arrested, who has attained the age of 18
years, shall not be admitted to bail sooner than 6 hours after arrest, except by a judge in open
court. The arrested person shall not be released out of court by a clerk of courts, clerk of a
district court, bail commissioner or master in chancery. Any person authorized to take bail for
such violation may impose conditions on a person's release in order to ensure the appearance of
the person before the court and the safety of the person, any other individual or the community;
provided, however, that the person authorized to take bail shall, prior to admitting the person to
bail, modifying an existing order of bail or imposing such conditions, have immediate access to
all pending and prior criminal offender record information, board of probation records and police
and incident reports related to the person detained, upon oral, telephonic, facsimile or electronic
mail request, to the extent practicable.
SECTION 3. Section 58 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the fifth paragraph the following paragraph:-
Except where prohibited by section 57, for any violation of (i) section 32 of chapter 94C
for the manufacture, sale or distribution of fentanyl; (ii) of subsections (c ½) or (c ¾) of section
32E of said chapter 94C; or (iii) subsection (a) of section 32F of said chapter 94C for the
manufacture, sale or distribution of fentanyl, a person arrested, who has attained the age of 18
years, shall not be admitted to bail sooner than 6 hours after arrest, except by a judge in open
court. The arrested person shall not be released out of court by a clerk of courts, clerk of a
district court, bail commissioner or master in chancery. Any person authorized to take bail for
of 3

such violation may impose conditions on a person's release in order to ensure the appearance of
the person before the court and the safety of the person, any other individual or the community;
provided, however, that the person authorized to take bail shall, prior to admitting the person to
bail, modifying an existing order of bail or imposing such conditions, have immediate access to
all pending and prior criminal offender record information, board of probation records and police
and incident reports related to the person detained, upon oral, telephonic, facsimile or electronic
mail request, to the extent practicable.
of 3